Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Chapter 10

Correction Volunteer Services

41-10-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the board of parole;

“Chair” means the chair of the board of parole;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of correction;

“Department” means the department of correction;

“Institution” means an institution of the department;

“Offender” means a person who is under the authority of the department, pursuant to a court order, a pending court disposition in a Tennessee criminal case or under the authority of the board, pursuant to release under probation or parole supervision, or some other release program from any correctional institution;

“Region” means a probation region of the department of correction;

“TCRB” means the Tennessee community resource board; and

“Volunteer” means any person who, after fulfilling appropriate policy requirements, is assigned to a volunteer job and provides a service without pay from the department or board except for compensation for those expenses incurred directly as the result of volunteer services as defined in this chapter. A “volunteer” may present any grievance related to volunteer services to the TCRB, which shall make recommendations to the commissioner or the board, as appropriate, and may appeal any decision of the TCRB to the commissioner or to the board, as appropriate.

Acts 1985, ch. 267, § 1; 2000, ch. 987, §§ 1-3.

Compiler's Notes. Compiler’s Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 727, § 1 amended § 4-3-104, which concerns name changes of departments and divisions, to provide that references to the board of probation and parole, formerly referred to in this section, are deemed references to the board of parole.

Cross-References. Temporary retention of disabled correctional officer or youth service worker, § 4-6-148.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 32.197.

41-10-102. Volunteers — Policies — Compensation — Inspection of records.

The department is authorized to recruit, train and appoint volunteers to programs of the department without regard to state employment regulations as administered by the department of human resources. Volunteers shall, however, be required to comply with all applicable department of correction policies. The department is further authorized to provide such incidental reimbursement as is consistent with this chapter and with appropriate state regulations.

The board is authorized to recruit, train and appoint volunteers to programs of the board without regard to state employment regulations as administered by the department of human resources. Volunteers shall be required to comply with all applicable board policies. The board is further authorized to provide such incidental reimbursement as is consistent with this chapter and with appropriate state regulations.

No court or law enforcement agency shall refuse to allow inspection of the court or agency's files and records by any volunteer demonstrating a need to know the contents of those files and records for the performance of official duties.

Acts 1985, ch. 267, § 1; 2000, ch. 987, § 5.

41-10-103. Duties of department of correction.

The department shall:

Take such actions as are necessary and appropriate to develop meaningful opportunities for volunteers to be involved in the department's programs, including the appointment of personnel as deemed necessary by the commissioner to administer volunteer services;

Develop written policy governing the recruitment, training, appointment and supervision of volunteers;

Take such action as is necessary to ensure that volunteers understand their duties and responsibilities;

Take such action as is necessary and appropriate to ensure a receptive climate for volunteers;

Provide for the recognition of volunteers who have offered outstanding service to the department; and

Recognize prior volunteer service as partial fulfillment of state employment requirements for training and experience pursuant to rules adopted by the department of human resources.

Acts 1985, ch. 267, § 1.

41-10-104. Meals — Travel expenses — Use of state vehicles.

Meals may be furnished without charge to volunteers if the scheduled volunteer assignment extends over an established meal period.

Travel expenses may be reimbursed to those volunteers whose volunteer assignment requires them to use their own vehicle or to be away from home in accordance with state travel regulations.

Volunteers may use state vehicles when their assignments so require, subject to the approval of the department and compliance with any rules or regulations that may be promulgated by the department.

Acts 1985, ch. 267, § 1; 1989, ch. 566, § 1.

41-10-105. Community resource board established.

There is established a Tennessee community resource board (TCRB) composed of seventeen (17) members. The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint a member of the house of representatives to serve on the TCRB and the speaker of the senate shall appoint a member of the senate to serve on the TCRB. Members of the general assembly who serve on the TCRB shall receive no additional compensation for their services, but shall receive compensation for expenses pursuant to § 3-1-106. The remaining members shall be appointed jointly by the commissioner and the chair. Five (5) members shall be appointed from each grand division of the state. Members shall serve terms of three (3) years. Members of the TCRB shall, upon expiration of their terms of office, be eligible for reappointment to successive terms. In making appointments to the board, the commissioner and the chair shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the TCRB is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person serving on the TCRB is a member of a racial minority. Members shall have served in a volunteer capacity in corrections, in probation or parole, or in an academic environment in the field of criminal justice or other related field. Vacancies shall be filled by the TCRB; provided, that the person filling the vacancy shall receive the written approval of the commissioner and chair.

The TCRB shall serve both the department and the board. The purpose of the TCRB shall be to:

Coordinate with and assist the department and the board in developing and utilizing volunteer resources in assisting parolees, probationers and inmates in reintegrating into society as productive, law-abiding citizens;

Coordinate with and assist the department and the board in developing policies and procedures governing the utilization of volunteers;

Coordinate a network of local parole, probation and institutional community resource boards on matters of statewide impact;

Advise the department and the board on matters of public interest and concern;

Assist the department and the board in accomplishing their missions;

Review and recommend programs having statewide impact involving volunteers; and

Oversee projects when appropriate.

Local parole, probation and prison institution community resource boards may be established. The purpose of these local boards is to cooperate with local probation and parole offices and correctional institutions to:

Develop a program plan for utilizing volunteers;

Establish specific goals for utilizing volunteers;

Establish performance measures for determining that goals are met; and

Collect data on the cost of using volunteers and the cost benefits to the local office or institution.

Local volunteer resource boards shall report semiannually to the TCRB on their program plans, goals and performance measures.

Acts 1985, ch. 267, § 1; 1989, ch. 278, § 76; 1991, ch. 160, § 7; 2000, ch. 987, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. The Tennessee community resource board (TCRB), created by this section, terminates June 30, 2025. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-246.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.